Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 37.16, is amended to read: 37.16 RULES; VIOLATION. The society may make all bylaws, ordinances, and rules consistent with law which it considers necessary or proper for the government of the fairgrounds and all fairs to be held on them, and for the protection, health, safety, and comfort of the public on the fairgroundsnew text begin provided no bylaw, ordinance, or rule prohibits the lawful carry or possession of firearms consistent with section 624.714new text end . The bylaws, ordinances, and rules are effective when filed with the secretary of the society. The violation of a bylaw, rule, or ordinance of the society is a misdemeanor. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.714, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Posting; trespass. (a) A person carrying a firearm on or about his or her person or clothes under a permit or otherwise who remains at a private establishment knowing that the operator of the establishment or its agent has made a reasonable request that firearms not be brought into the establishment may be ordered to leave the premises. A person who fails to leave when so requested is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. The fine for a first offense must not exceed $25. Notwithstanding section 609.531, a firearm carried in violation of this subdivision is not subject to forfeiture. (b) As used in this subdivision, the terms in this paragraph have the meanings given. (1) "Reasonable request" means a request made under the following circumstances: (i) the requester has prominently posted a conspicuous sign at every entrance to the establishment containing the following language: "(INDICATE IDENTITY OF OPERATOR) BANS GUNS IN THESE PREMISES."; or (ii) the requester or the requester's agent personally informs the person that guns are prohibited in the premises and demands compliance. (2) "Prominently" means readily visible and within four feet laterally of the entrance with the bottom of the sign at a height of four to six feet above the floor. (3) "Conspicuous" means lettering in black arial typeface at least 1-1/2 inches in height against a bright contrasting background that is at least 187 square inches in area. (4) "Private establishment" means a building, structure, or portion thereof that is owned, leased, controlled, or operated by a nongovernmental entity for a nongovernmental purpose. new text begin (5) "Governmental entity" includes but is not limited to the State Agricultural Society when it conducts activities on the State Fairgrounds consistent with the public purposes identified in section 37.01. new text end (c) The owner or operator of a private establishment may not prohibit the lawful carry or possession of firearms in a parking facility or parking area. (d) The owner or operator of a private establishment may not prohibit the lawful carry or possession of firearms by a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), within the private establishment or deny the officer access thereto, except when specifically authorized by statute. The owner or operator of the private establishment may require the display of official credentials issued by the agency that employs the peace officer prior to granting the officer entry into the private establishment. (e) This subdivision does not apply to private residences. The lawful possessor of a private residence may prohibit firearms, and provide notice thereof, in any lawful manner. (f) A landlord may not restrict the lawful carry or possession of firearms by tenants or their guests. (g) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions in section 609.605, this subdivision sets forth the exclusive criteria to notify a permit holder when otherwise lawful firearm possession is not allowed in a private establishment and sets forth the exclusive penalty for such activity. (h) This subdivision does not apply to a security guard acting in the course and scope of employment. The owner or operator of a private establishment may require the display of official credentials issued by the company, which must be licensed by the Private Detective and Protective Agent Services Board, that employs the security guard and the guard's permit card prior to granting the guard entrance into the private establishment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end